Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of Consumer
and Business Services for the following purposes:
(1) Workers’ Compensation
Board ........................................ $ 29,700,797
(2) Workers’ Compensation
Division..................................... $ 59,178,637
(3) Oregon OSHA ............................ $ 55,532,432
(4) Central Services Division .......... $ 59,744,101
(5) Division of Financial
Regulation................................. $167,569,714
(6) Building Codes Division ............ $ 46,044,075
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the  Department of Consumer and
Business Services for the following purposes:
(1) Oregon OSHA ............................ $ 14,556,518
(2) Central Services Division .......... $ 360,746
(3) Building Codes Division ............ $ 302,794
(4) Division of Financial
Regulation................................. $120,075,414
SECTION 3. For the  biennium beginning July 1, 2023, the following expenditures by the
Department of Consumer and Business Services are not limited:
(1) Expenditures from the Workers’ Benefit Fund;
(2) Expenditures from the Self-Insured Employer Adjustment Reserve;
(3) Expenditures from the Self-Insured Employer Group Adjustment Reserve;
(4) Expenditures from the Consumer and Business Services Fund for  payment of con-
tracted collection costs, including contracted processing costs for the Combined Payroll  Tax
Enrolled House Bill 5010 (HB 5010-A) Page 1
Reporting System and  workers’ compensation paying agent reimbursements as described in
ORS 656.307;
(5) Expenditures from the Funeral and Cemetery Consumer Protection Trust Fund; and
(6) Special payments to Oregon Health and Science University for  research on occupa-
tional illness and disease.
SECTION 4.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Passed by House May 24, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5010 (HB 5010-A) Page 2